Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3571] RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT BY A RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Title. new text end new text begin This act shall be known as the "Yes in God's Back Yard (YIGBY) Housing Act." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Affordable housing" means: new text end new text begin (1) rental housing in which at least 20 percent of the units are affordable to households earning incomes of no more than 50 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; new text end new text begin (2) rental housing in which at least 40 percent of the units are affordable to households earning incomes of no more than 60 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; and new text end new text begin (3) owner-occupied housing in which all of the units are affordable to households earning at or below 115 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. new text end new text begin (c) "Compelling governmental interest" means the government's interest in the qualified development proposal under consideration, as opposed to the government's interests in regulating land use in general. new text end new text begin (d) "Religious institution" means a congregation, religious assembly, organization, or institution in which a person engages in any exercise of religion, whether or not compelled by, or central to, a system of religious belief. new text end new text begin (e) "Qualified development" means an affordable housing development proposed by a religious institution on land owned by the religious institution for at least one year from the closing date of the purchase. new text end new text begin (f) "Municipality" has the meaning given in section 462.352, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certain ordinances prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality must not adopt or enforce a zoning ordinance, law, or regulation in a manner that imposes a substantial burden on the religious exercise of a person, including a religious institution, unless the government demonstrates that imposition of the burden on that person or religious institution: new text end new text begin (1) is in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest; and new text end new text begin (2) is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest. new text end new text begin (b) A religious institution seeking to develop affordable housing may provide notice to a municipality in writing that the application of a zoning ordinance, law, or regulation to a qualified development constitutes a substantial burden on the religious institution. new text end new text begin (c) Upon receipt of the substantial burden notice described in paragraph (b), a municipality must temporarily suspend enforcement of the restriction cited in the notice, conduct a legal and factual review to determine whether the restriction complies with this section, and make a written determination. new text end new text begin (d) Within 30 days of receiving the notice under paragraph (b), the municipality must provide the religious institution with the municipality's written determination and outline what steps the municipality intends to take based on the determination. If the municipality determines the ordinance, law, or regulation at issue fails to meet the standard in paragraph (a), either on its face or as applied, the municipality must suspend or adjust its application of the ordinance, law, or regulation. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this section is intended to conflict with United States Code, title 42, section 2000cc. new text end new text begin (f) This subdivision does not apply to any rule or law that is necessary to enforce a state or federal law or rule. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Private remedies. new text end new text begin A religious institution injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action in district court for damages, injunctive relief, or other appropriate relief, including an award of reasonable attorney fees. The remedies available under this section are in addition to any other remedies available in equity or in law. new text end